Arkansas, session 2025, HB1488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-81-203(c), concerning the right of an
insurer to defer the payment of any cash surrender value Standard
Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The insurer shall reserve the right to defer the payment of any
cash surrender value for a period of six (6) months after demand therefor
with surrender of the policy., subject to the following:
(1) The policy death benefit shall remain in full force and
effect until payment is made; and
(2) If payment is not made within thirty (30) days after demand
is made for the surrender of the policy, in addition to the cash surrender
value, the insurer shall pay interest on the cash surrender value at the
prime rate as published in the Wall Street Journal on the day that the demand
is made for surrender of the policy and accruing from the date of surrender
*ANS256*
03-17-2025 13:58:53 ANS256

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 S3/17/25 HB1488
until the cash surrender value is paid in full within the six-month period.

/s/Wardlaw

































03-17-2025 13:58:53 ANS256